Washington statutes.
RCW 36.89.093

Stormwater control facilities—Alternative procedures for lien on delinquent charges.

Any county may, by resolution or ordinance, provide that the stormwater service charge lien shall be effective for a total not to exceed one year's delinquent service charges without the necessity of any writing or recording of the lien with the county auditor, in lieu of the provisions provided for in RCW 35.67.210.

[ 1987 c 241 s 3.]